Hawaii statutes.
§667-82 Noncompliance with requirements; statement. (a) The neutral's closing report shall indicate if the mortgagee
or the owner-occupant failed to comply with requirements of the mortgage
foreclosure dispute resolution program.

(1) In the case of the mortgagee, failure to
comply with the requirements of the program may consist of:

(A) Participation in dispute resolution
without the authority to negotiate a loan modification or without access at all
stages of the dispute resolution process to a person who is so authorized;

(B) Failure to provide the required
information or documents;

(C) Refusal to cooperate or participate in
dispute resolution; or

(D) Refusal or failure to pay program fees
under section 667-79 in a timely manner.

(2) In the case of the owner-occupant,
failure to comply with the requirements of the program may consist of:

(A) Failure to provide the required
information or documents; or

(B) Refusal to cooperate or participate in
dispute resolution;

provided that failure by the mortgagee and the
owner-occupant to reach an agreement to resolve the dispute shall not
constitute failure by the mortgagee or the owner-occupant to comply with the
requirements of the mortgage foreclosure dispute resolution program.

(b)
If the neutral determines that the noncompliance was unjustified as a result of
circumstances within a party's control, sanctions may be imposed on the
noncompliant party as follows:

(1) Sanctions against a mortgagee for
unjustified noncompliance with the program shall include a stay of the
foreclosure under section 667-83 and a fine payable to the owner-occupant not
to exceed $1,500; or

(2) Sanctions against an owner-occupant for
unjustified noncompliance with the program shall include a removal of the stay
of the foreclosure pursuant to section 667-83(b) and a fine payable to the
mortgagee not to exceed $1,500. [L 2011, c 48, pt of §1, §45(2);
am L 2012, c 182, §§46, 49]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next